Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Improvements by Assessed Value

7-33-301. Part definitions.

For the purpose of this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assessed value basis” means the plan for making annual improvement assessments according to the assessed values of benefited properties, as assessed for purposes of municipal property taxation, or as provided by this part. Such assessed values shall be the measure of benefits to benefited property or property to be benefited;

“Benefited property” or “property to be benefited” means, as determined by the governing body, land, excluding improvement, that is within a reasonable distance from a sanitary sewer and to which is made available a means of drainage for sewage, or that abuts on a street or other public way to be improved;

“Costs” means cost of labor, materials, equipment necessary to complete an improvement, land, easements, and other necessary expenses connected with an improvement, including preliminary and other surveys, inspections of the work, engineers' fees and costs, attorneys' fees, fiscal agents' fees, preparation of plans and specifications, publication expenses, interest that may become due on bonds before collection of the first improvement assessments, a reasonable allowance for unforeseen contingencies, and other costs of financing;

“Governing body” means the board or body in which the general legislative powers of a municipality are vested;

“Improvement” means the construction, installation or substantial reconstruction of sanitary sewers; construction, substantial reconstruction, or widening of streets, sidewalks and other public ways, including necessary storm drainage facilities; the undergrounding of electrical and other similar overhead utility cables, including streetscape improvements; or any combination of the foregoing; provided, that “improvement” does not include any improvement of a street, other than necessary drainage facilities, exceeding thirty-six feet (36') in width;

“Improvement assessment” means an assessment made each year against benefited property to pay the costs of an improvement, in the proportion that the assessed value of each parcel or lot of benefited property bears to the total assessed value of all benefited property according to the latest assessments of such property for purposes of municipal property taxation or as provided by this part;

“Municipality” means incorporated city or town; and

“Sanitary sewer” means an underground conduit for the passage of a sewer, and pumping stations, pressure lines, and outlets where deemed necessary.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-1251; Acts 2004, ch. 541, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Impact Fees in Tennessee, a Public and Private Partnership (Andrea C. Barach, Jane Pine Wood), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 685 (1988).

7-33-302. Improvements authorized — Authority supplemental — Abandonment of alternative procedures — Limitations — Financing of improvements.

Municipalities are authorized to provide for, construct, and finance improvements defined in § 7-33-301 according to the plan set forth in this part.

The authority hereby conferred is not intended to be in derogation of any authority otherwise conferred upon any municipality, but is alternative and in addition to such authority.

If a municipality has taken any step or steps under any other law to provide for, construct or finance such improvements, it may by resolution abandon the procedure under the other law and proceed under this part.

The issuance of bonds under this part shall not be subject to any limitations on municipal indebtedness imposed by any city charter or public or private act.

This part shall not require financing of improvements authorized in this part by the issuance of bonds. A municipality may pay for or finance improvements authorized to be made within this part by any other means authorized by charter or state law, and may recover the cost of payment or financing such improvements in the same manner set forth in this part for the issuance of bonds.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-1252; Acts 1987, ch. 81, § 1.

7-33-303. Resolution for improvement — Contents — Publication — Notice.

When the governing body of a municipality shall determine to construct an improvement as authorized by this part, or when it is petitioned by the owners of property to be benefited having an assessed value of at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the total assessed value of all the property to be benefited from the proposed improvement, it shall adopt a resolution that such improvement shall be made. The resolution shall describe the geographical limits of the properties to be benefited, and the location, nature, scope and extent of the improvement. The resolution shall also include a preliminary estimate of the costs prepared by an engineer licensed by the state of Tennessee, a declaration that the improvement will be designed and construction will be supervised by an engineer licensed by the state of Tennessee, and a statement of the proportion of total costs to be assessed against benefited properties, which shall not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total costs of the improvement; provided, that the total costs may be assessed against benefited properties if the governing body additionally pledges full faith and credit of the municipality to satisfy any deficiency in collections of improvement assessments. In all succeeding proceedings, the municipality shall be bound and limited by the resolution as it may be amended, except that the total costs assessed against benefited properties may exceed the preliminary estimate of costs by not more than ten percent (10%). The resolution shall provide for a public hearing before the governing body at a time and place specified in the resolution.

The municipality shall publish the resolution and a notice of the hearing at least seven (7) days in advance of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality and by posting at the main office of the municipal government.

The notice shall state that any owner of property to be benefited may appear to be heard as to:

Whether the proposed improvement should be undertaken as planned, or abandoned;

Whether the nature and scope of the improvement should be altered; and

Whether the improvement should be financed through the issuance of bonds on the “assessed value basis” as authorized by this part.

The notice should also be sent by first class mail to the owners of properties to be benefited or their agents of record, at the time of adoption of the resolution, at the addresses currently entered on the property assessment records.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-1253.

7-33-304. Public hearing — Final action of municipality — Petition for certiorari.

At the public hearing required by § 7-33-303, or at the time and place to which the hearing may be adjourned from time to time, all persons whose property may be affected by such improvement may appear in person or by attorney or by petition.

After the public hearing and after considering any objections, the governing body by resolution may confirm, amend or rescind the original resolution as its final action.

Such final action shall be the final determination of the issues presented, unless the owner of property to be benefited files, within ten (10) days thereafter, a petition for certiorari in the circuit court having jurisdiction to review the action of the governing body. Failure to take such steps within the ten (10) days constitutes a waiver of all objections.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-1254.

7-33-305. Construction bids — Amount of bond issue — Performance bond — When bids binding — Construction by municipality's own forces.

Proposals for the construction of an improvement shall be solicited as sealed competitive bids after public advertisement at least once in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality not less than ten (10) days prior to the date set for receipt of bids.

Upon or after the acceptance by the governing body of a bid, or combination of bids, the governing body may determine the principal amount of bonds to be issued for the proposed improvement, taking into account the amount of the accepted bid or bids, and all other costs of the improvement. These bonds shall be issued pursuant to the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21.

Each contract shall be supported by a performance bond for the full amount of the contract, with good surety to be approved by the governing body.

A bid shall not be binding on a contractor unless the governing body awards a contract within ninety (90) days after the date of opening bids.

If the governing body determines that no bids are acceptable, it may direct that the improvement be accomplished by the municipality's own forces, in which event the costs of construction included in the total costs for purposes of determining improvement assessments shall not exceed the lowest construction bid or bids that conform to all bid requirements.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-1255; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 18.

7-33-306 — 7-33-309. [Reserved.]

Improvement assessments shall be assessed annually against the benefited property in the proportion that the assessed value of each lot or parcel bears to the whole assessed value of the benefited properties. Properties not assessed for taxation, such as public property or property exempt from taxation, except church-owned property located in cities as defined in § 67-6-103(a)(3)(B)(i), shall be specially assessed by the municipal assessor of property, by the county assessor of property if the municipality uses county property assessments, or by a special assessor of property appointed by the governing body for this purpose, for which compensation may be paid from the “(name of improvement) special fund” or from the general fund of the municipality. Any such special assessment shall be subject to the procedure for equalization and judicial review provided by the law for assessments made for purposes of property taxation.

Improvement assessments authorized by this part shall not be levied against undeveloped or largely undeveloped areas, but shall be limited to areas in which a majority of the lots or parcels of land contain buildings or other structures.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, §§ 3, 10; T.C.A., § 6-1260; Acts 2006, ch. 557, § 1; 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See §1-1-116.

7-33-311. Additional properties benefiting from improvement — Adjustments in assessments.

The governing body by resolution may authorize properties other than the properties originally benefited by an improvement to receive the benefits of the improvement, and may make equitable provisions, which may be adjusted from year to year as bonds are retired, whereby the owners of such later benefited properties will assume a fair proportionate share of the improvement assessments, or otherwise be placed as nearly as practicable on a basis of financial equity with the owners of properties initially subject to the improvement assessments.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 11; T.C.A., § 6-1261.

7-33-312. Benefited property subject to assessments.

Benefited property owned by the municipality, a county, the state of Tennessee, or the United States government or its agencies, if federal law makes such property subject to assessment, shall be subject to improvement assessments, the same as private property, and the amount of each annual improvement assessment shall be paid by the municipality, county, state of Tennessee, or United States government, as the case may be. In the case of the state of Tennessee, the amount of improvement assessment shall be certified by the municipality to the commissioner of finance and administration, who shall direct the state treasurer to pay the assessment to the municipality out of an appropriate appropriation or from any money in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated. No benefited property shall be exempt from improvement assessments. Improvement assessments against such public property shall be enforceable by writ of mandamus or other appropriate remedy.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 12; modified; T.C.A., § 6-1262.

7-33-313. Levy of assessments — Time for payment — Installments — Delinquency.

Annual improvement assessments for each improvement shall be made by the governing body when the levy of municipal property taxes is made; and such improvement assessments shall be due at the same time, or times, the municipal property taxes are due, and shall be subject to the same penalties and accrual of interest in the event of nonpayment as in the case of municipal property taxes. The governing body may permit owners of benefited property to pay improvement assessments in equal monthly installments, the first installment to be due and payable when the improvement assessment is due; in this event any monthly payment shall be delinquent thirty (30) days after it is due and payable, and the whole balance of the annual improvement assessment shall then become delinquent and be subject to all penalties and interest as provided in this part.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 13; T.C.A., § 6-1263.

7-33-314. Lien on benefited property.

Each improvement assessment, with any penalty or interest incident to the nonpayment of the assessment, shall constitute a lien upon the lot or parcel of benefited property against which it is assessed. The lien shall attach to each lot or parcel of benefited property at the time the annual improvement assessment is made, and then shall take precedence over all other liens, whether created prior to or subsequent to the making of such improvement assessment, except state, county and municipal property taxes, and prior special assessments. The lien shall not be defeated or postponed by any private or judicial sale, by any mortgage, or by any error or mistake in the description of the property or in the names of the owners, if the description is sufficient to identify the property subject to the assessment. No irregularity in the proceedings of the governing body shall exempt any benefited property from the lien for the improvement assessment, or from the payment of the assessment, or from the penalties or interest on the assessment.

Acts 1961, ch. 311, § 14; T.C.A., § 6-1264.

7-33-310. Assessments.